Tennessee, session 114, SB0829.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-602(a), is amended by
redesignating subsection (a) as subdivision (a)(1) and adding the following new subdivision:
(2) It is an offense for a person, who is driving a motor vehicle that has been
lawfully stopped by a law enforcement officer, to intentionally refuse the law enforcement
officer's request that the person exit from the motor vehicle.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0829
002762
- 1 -